Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202550-2017
Confidential information or confidential records; sharing; restrictions; grounds for dismissal.

(1) Except as otherwise provided by law, any confidential information or confidential records shared with the office of Public Counsel shall remain confidential and shall not be shared by an employee of the office with any person who is not an employee of the office, including any member of the Legislative Oversight Committee.

(2) The office of Public Counsel and the Division of Legislative Oversight may share confidential information as necessary to carry out the responsibilities of such office and division. Such sharing of confidential information shall include, but not be limited to, the sharing of confidential information when necessary to refer complaints between such office and division and to assist in investigations and the resolution of complaints. The office of Public Counsel and the Division of Legislative Oversight, at the discretion of the Public Counsel and the Director of Legislative Oversight, may coordinate to work jointly on complaints and investigations in circumstances of overlapping jurisdiction.

(3) If any employee of the office of Public Counsel knowingly divulges or makes known, in any manner not permitted by law, confidential information or confidential records, it shall be grounds for dismissal.

Laws 2025, LB298, § 17.